Massachusetts, session 194th, H1976.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 57 of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after the
second sentence the following sentence:- The bail amount as well as the charges must be
reported to the Committee for Public Counsel Services so that the data may be tracked to ensure
proper implementation of the above.
of 1